Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB656.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 286.9-140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A common database with real-time access through an internet connection for
deferred deposit service business licensees implemented in accordance with
this subtitle shall be accessible to the department and a deferred deposit
service business licensee to verify whether any deferred deposit transactions
are outstanding for a particular person.
(b) A deferred deposit service business licensee shall accurately and promptly
submit such data into the database as may be required by the commissioner
before entering into each deferred deposit transaction in such format as the
commissioner may require by administrative regulation or order, including the
customer's name, Social Security number or employment authorization alien
number, address, driver's license number, amount of the transaction, date of
transaction, date that the completed transaction is closed, and any additional
information required by the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to administer and enforce the provisions of this
subtitle and to assure that the database is used by deferred deposit service
business licensees in accordance with this subtitle.
(2) The commissioner shall impose a fee of[not to exceed] three dollars ($3) per
transaction for data required to be submitted by a deferred deposit service business
licensee, which fee may be charged to the customer.
(3) (a) The commissioner may operate the database or may select and contract with a
third-party provider to operate the database.
(b) If the commissioner contracts with a third-party provider for the operation of
the database, all of the following apply:
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
1. The commissioner shall ensure that the third-party provider selected as
the database provider operates the database pursuant to the provisions of
this subtitle;
2. The commissioner shall consider cost of service and ability to meet all
the requirements of this subtitle in selecting a third-party provider as the
database provider;
3. In selecting a third-party provider to act as the database provider, the
commissioner shall give strong consideration to the third-party
provider's ability to prevent fraud, abuse, and other unlawful activities
associated with deferred deposit transactions and provide additional
tools for the administration and enforcement of this subtitle;
4. The third-party provider shall use the data collected under this subtitle
only as prescribed in this subtitle and the contract with the department
and for no other purpose;
5. If the third-party provider violates this subtitle, the commissioner may
terminate the contract and the third-party provider may be barred from
becoming a party to any other state contracts;
6. A person injured by the third-party provider's violation of this subtitle
may maintain a civil cause of action against the third-party provider and
may recover actual damages plus reasonable attorney's fees and court
costs; and
7. The commissioner may require that the third-party provider collect the
fee assessed in subsection (2) of this section from the licensee. The
third-party provider shall remit the fee collected from the licensee to the
commissioner no later than the first day of each month. The third-party
provider shall deposit any fee collected in a separate escrow account in a
federally insured financial institution and shall hold the fee deposited in
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
trust for the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(4) The database shall allow a deferred deposit service business licensee accessing the
database to do all of the following:
(a) Verify whether a customer has any open deferred deposit transactions with
any deferred deposit business service licensee that have not been closed;
(b) Provide information necessary to ensure deferred deposit service business
licensee compliance with any requirements imposed by the United States
Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control and United States Treasury Office
of Financial Crimes Enforcement Network; and
(c) Track and monitor the number of customers who notify a deferred deposit
service business licensee of violations of this subtitle, the number of times a
deferred deposit service business licensee agreed that a violation occurred, the
number of times that a deferred deposit service business licensee did not agree
that a violation occurred, the amount of restitution paid, and any other
information the commissioner requires by administrative regulation or order.
(5) While operating the database, the database provider shall do all of the following:
(a) Establish and maintain a process for responding to transaction verification
requests due to technical difficulties occurring with the database that prevent
the licensee from accessing the database through the internet;
(b) Comply with any applicable federal and state provisions to prevent identity
theft;
(c) Provide accurate and secure receipt, transmission, and storage of customer
data; and
(d) Meet the requirements of this subtitle.
(6) When the database provider receives notification that a deferred deposit transaction
has been closed, the database provider shall designate the transaction as closed in
the database immediately, but in no event after 11:59 p.m. on the day the
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
commissioner or database provider receives notification.
(7) (a) The database provider shall automatically designate a deferred deposit
transaction as closed in the database five (5) days after the transaction
maturity date unless a deferred deposit service business licensee reports to the
database provider before that time that the transaction remains open because:
1. Of the customer's failure to make payment;
2. The customer's payment instrument or an electronic redeposit is in the
process of clearing the banking system;
3. The customer's payment instrument is being returned to the deferred
deposit service business licensee for insufficient funds, a closed account,
or a stop payment order; or
4. Of any other factors determined by the commissioner.
(b) If a deferred deposit service business licensee reports the status of a
transaction as open in a timely manner, the transaction remains an open
transaction until it is closed and the database provider is notified that the
transaction is closed.
(8) (a) If a deferred deposit service business licensee stops providing deferred deposit
transactions, the database provider shall designate all open transactions with
that licensee as closed in the database sixty (60) days after the date the
deferred deposit service business licensee stops offering deferred deposit
transactions, unless the deferred deposit service business licensee reports to
the database provider before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period which
of its transactions remain open and the specific reason each transaction
remains open.
(b) The deferred deposit service business licensee shall also provide to the
commissioner a reasonably acceptable plan that outlines how the deferred
deposit service business licensee will continue to update the database after it
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
stops offering deferred deposit transactions.
(c) The commissioner shall promptly approve or disapprove the plan and
immediately notify the deferred deposit service business licensee of the
commissioner's decision.
(d) If the plan is disapproved, the deferred deposit service business licensee may
submit a new plan or may submit a modified plan for the deferred deposit
service business licensee to follow.
(e) If at any time the commissioner reasonably determines that a deferred deposit
service business licensee that has stopped offering deferred deposit
transactions is not updating the database in accordance with its approved plan,
the commissioner shall immediately close or instruct the database provider to
immediately close all remaining open transactions of that deferred deposit
service business licensee.
(9) (a) The response to an inquiry to the database provider by a deferred deposit
service business licensee shall state only that a person is eligible or ineligible
for a new deferred deposit transaction and describe the reason for that
determination.
(b) Only the person seeking the transaction may make a direct inquiry to the
database provider to request a more detailed explanation of a particular
transaction that was the basis for the ineligibility determination.
(c) Any information regarding any person's transaction history is confidential; is
not subject to public inspection; is not a public record subject to the disclosure
requirements of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884; is
not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other compulsory process, except in an
administrative or legal action arising under this subtitle; and shall not be
disclosed to any person other than the commissioner.
(10) The commissioner may access the database only for purposes of an investigation of,
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
examination of, or enforcement action concerning an individual database provider,
licensee, customer, or other person.
(11) (a) The commissioner shall investigate violations of and enforce this subtitle.
(b) The commissioner shall not delegate his or her responsibilities under this
subsection to any third-party provider.
(12) The commissioner may, by administrative regulation or order, do all of the
following:
(a) Require that data be retained in the database only as required to ensure
deferred deposit service business licensee compliance with this subtitle;
(b) Require that customer transaction data in the database are archived within
three hundred sixty-five (365) days after the customer transaction is closed
unless needed for a pending enforcement or legal action;
(c) Require that any identifying customer information is deleted from the
database when data are archived; and
(d) Require that data in the database concerning a customer transaction are
deleted from the database three (3) years after the customer transaction is
closed or, if any administrative, legal, or law enforcement action is pending,
three (3) years after the administrative, legal, or law enforcement action is
completed, whichever is later.
(13) The commissioner may maintain access to data archived under subsection (12) of
this section for examination, investigation, or legislative or policy review.
(14) A deferred deposit service business licensee may rely on the information contained
in the database as accurate and is not subject to any administrative penalty or civil
liability as a result of relying on inaccurate information contained in the database,
provided the deferred deposit licensee accurately and promptly submits such data as
required before entering into a deferred deposit transaction with a customer.
(15) The commissioner may use the database to administer and enforce this subtitle.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2173
(16) The commissioner may require a database provider to file a report by March 1 of
each year containing the following information:
(a) The total number and dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions entered
into in the calendar year ending December 31 of the previous year;
(b) The total number and dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions
outstanding as of December 31 of the previous year;
(c) The total dollar amount of fees collected for deferred deposit transactions as
of December 31 of the previous year;
(d) The minimum, maximum, and average dollar amount of deferred deposit
transactions entered into, the total dollar amount of the net charge-offs and
write-offs, and the net recoveries of licensees as of December 31 of the
previous year;
(e) The average deferred deposit transaction amount, the average number of
transactions, and the average aggregate deferred deposit transaction amount
entered into per customer as of December 31 of the previous year;
(f) The average number of days a customer was engaged in a deferred deposit
transaction for the previous year; and
(g) An estimate of the average total fees paid per customer for deferred deposit
transactions for the previous year.
Section 2. This Act applies to deferred deposit transactions entered on or after
the effective date of this Act.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/16/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed